Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.450

Railroad sign or signal.

"Railroad sign or signal" means any sign, signal, or device erected by authority of a public body or official or by a railroad and intended to give notice of the presence of railroad tracks or the approach of a railroad train.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.450. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 49; prior: 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part.]